Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 3. Wyoming Travel Commission [Repealed]

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of travel publication, travel agent, or similar party for personal injury or death of traveler, 2 ALR5th 396.

Editor's notes. —

Several of the sections of this article, relating to the Wyoming Travel Commission, which derived from Laws 1947, ch. 93 and Laws 1965, ch. 78, were repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 6, § 5, effective July 1, 1998. Laws 1998, ch. 6, § 4, renumbered §

9-2-306

as §

9-12-401

, effective July 1, 1998.

§§ 9-2-301 and 9-2-302.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 6, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1947, ch. 93, §§ 1 and 3, related to the creation and membership of the Wyoming Travel Commission.

§ 9-2-303.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 44, § 3; Laws 1998, ch. 6, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1947, ch. 93, § 4, related to the director of the Wyoming travel commission.

§§ 9-2-304 and 9-2-305.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 6, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1947, ch. 93, § 5 and Laws 1965, ch. 78, § 1, related to the powers and duties of the Wyoming Travel Commission, and charges for promotional materials.

§ 9-2-306.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

9-12-401

by Laws 1998, ch. 6, § 4.